New York, session 2025-2026, A9561.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The transportation law is amended by adding a new section 2 23 to read as follows: 3 § 23. Distribution of road salt. 1. The department, every munici- 4 pality, locality, and public authority shall not spread road salt at a 5 rate higher than three hundred pounds per lane mile on average during 6 each snow and ice management season. The limits for application on 7 parking lots and sidewalks is set at 4.7 pounds per one thousand square 8 feet. 9 2. For the purposes of this section, the term "road salt" shall mean a 10 mineral form of sodium chloride to melt snow and ice on roads by lower- 11 ing water's freezing point. 12 3. All road salt equipment shall be metered and calibrated. 13 4. The department shall provide annual data on its website to the 14 public regarding the use of road salt. 15 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD13870-02-5